District of Columbia statutes.
38-826.04

School nurses.

The square footage of a nurse’s suite shall not be a determining factor as to whether or not a school nurse is placed at a public charter school; provided, that all other conditions as required by the Department of Health are met.

July 27, 2010, D.C. Law 18-209, § 604, 57 DCR 4779
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see §§ 2(n), 3 of Healthy Schools Emergency Amendment Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-143, August 9, 2011, 58 DCR 6814).